California statutes. Penal Code
-------------------------------------------

25920.

(a) The agency from which a peace officer is honorably retired, or a successor agency pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25905, may, upon initial retirement of the peace officer, or at any time subsequent thereto, deny or revoke for good cause the retired officer’s privilege to carry a loaded firearm.

(b) A peace officer who is listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who is retired prior to January 1, 1981, shall have the privilege to carry a loaded firearm denied or revoked by having the agency from which the officer retired,
 or a successor agency pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25905, stamp on the officer’s identification certificate “No CCW privilege.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 149, Sec. 3.   (SB 303)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25925.

(a) An honorably retired peace officer who is listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 and authorized to carry a loaded firearm by this article shall meet the training requirements of Section 832 and shall qualify with the firearm at least annually.

(b) The individual retired peace officer shall be responsible for maintaining eligibility to carry a loaded firearm.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide subsequent arrest notification pursuant to Section 11105.2 regarding honorably retired peace officers listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 to the agency from which the officer has retired, or a successor
 agency pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25905.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 149, Sec. 4.   (SB 303)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Exemptions to the Crime of Carrying a Loaded Firearm in Public  [26000. - 26060.]

26000.

Section 25850 does not apply to members of the military forces of this state or of the United States engaged in the performance of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26005.

Section 25850 does not apply to either of the following:

(a) Persons who are using target ranges for the purpose of practice shooting with a firearm.

(b) Members of shooting clubs while hunting on the premises of those clubs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26010.

Section 25850 does not apply to the carrying of any handgun by any person as authorized pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) of Division 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26015.

Section 25850 does not apply to any armored vehicle guard, as defined in Section 7582.1 of the Business and Professions Code, if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The guard was hired prior to January 1, 1977, and is acting within the course and scope of employment. 

(b) The guard was hired on or after January 1, 1977, has received a firearms qualification card from the Department of Consumer Affairs, and is acting within the course and scope of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26020.

(a) Upon approval of the sheriff of the county in which the retiree resides, Section 25850 does not apply to any honorably retired federal officer or agent of any federal law enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the United States Secret Service, the United States Customs Service, the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, the Federal Bureau of Narcotics, the United States Drug Enforcement Administration, the United States Border Patrol, and any officer or agent of the Internal Revenue Service who was authorized to carry weapons while on duty, who was assigned to duty within the state for a period of not less than one year, or who retired from active service in the state.

(b) A retired federal officer or agent shall provide the sheriff with certification from the agency from which the officer or agent retired certifying that person’s service in the state, stating the nature of that person’s retirement, and indicating the agency’s concurrence that the retired federal officer or agent should be accorded the privilege of carrying a loaded firearm.

(c) Upon approval, the sheriff shall issue a permit to the retired federal officer or agent indicating that the retiree may carry a loaded firearm in accordance with this section. The permit shall be valid for a period not exceeding five years, shall be carried by the retiree while carrying a loaded firearm, and may be revoked for good cause.

(d) The sheriff of the county in which the retired federal officer or agent resides may require
 recertification prior to a permit renewal, and may suspend the privilege for cause. The sheriff may charge a fee necessary to cover any reasonable expenses incurred by the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 231.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26025.

Section 25850 does not apply to any of the following who have completed a regular course in firearms training approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training:

(a) Patrol special police officers appointed by the police commission of any city, county, or city and county under the express terms of its charter who also, under the express terms of the charter, satisfy all of the following requirements: 

(1) They are subject to suspension or dismissal after a hearing on charges duly filed with the commission after a fair and impartial trial.

(2) They are not less than 18
 years of age or more than 40 years of age.

(3) They possess physical qualifications prescribed by the commission.

(4) They are designated by the police commission as the owners of a certain beat or territory as may be fixed from time to time by the police commission.

(b) Animal control officers or zookeepers, regularly compensated in that capacity by a governmental agency, when carrying weapons while acting in the course and scope of their employment and when designated by a local ordinance or, if the governmental agency is not authorized to act by ordinance, by a resolution, either individually or by class, to carry the weapons.

(c) Persons who are authorized to carry the weapons pursuant to Section 14502 of the Corporations Code, while actually
 engaged in the performance of their duties pursuant to that section.

(d) Harbor police officers designated pursuant to Section 663.5 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26030.

(a) Section 25850 does not apply to any of the following who have been issued a certificate pursuant to subdivision (d):

(1) Guards or messengers of common carriers, banks, and other financial institutions, while actually employed in and about the shipment, transportation, or delivery of any money, treasure, bullion, bonds, or other thing of value within this state.

(2) Guards of contract carriers operating armored vehicles pursuant to California Highway Patrol and Public Utilities Commission authority, if they were hired prior to January 1, 1977.

(3) Guards of
 contract carriers operating armored vehicles pursuant to California Highway Patrol and Public Utilities Commission authority, if they were hired on or after January 1, 1977, and they have completed a course in the carrying and use of firearms that meets the standards prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(4) Private investigators licensed pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, while acting within the course and scope of their employment.

(5) Uniformed employees of private investigators licensed pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, while acting within the course and scope of their employment.

(6) Private patrol operators licensed pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing
 with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, while acting within the course and scope of their employment.

(7) Uniformed employees of private patrol operators licensed pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, while acting within the course and scope of their employment.

(8) Alarm company operators licensed pursuant to Chapter 11.6 (commencing with Section 7590) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, while acting within the course and scope of their employment.

(9) Uniformed security guards or night watch persons employed by any public agency, while acting within the scope and course of their employment.

(10) Uniformed security guards, regularly
 employed and compensated in that capacity by persons engaged in any lawful business, and uniformed alarm agents employed by an alarm company operator, while actually engaged in protecting and preserving the property of their employers, or on duty or en route to or from their residences or their places of employment, and security guards and alarm agents en route to or from their residences or employer-required range training.

(b) Nothing in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) shall be construed to prohibit cities and counties from enacting ordinances requiring alarm agents to register their names.

(c) A certificate under this section shall not be required of any person who is a peace officer, who has completed all training required by law for the exercise of the person’s power as a peace officer, and who is employed while not on duty as a peace officer.

(d) The Department of Consumer Affairs may issue a certificate to any person referred to in this section, upon notification by the school where the course was completed, that the person has successfully completed a course in the carrying and use of firearms and a course of training in the exercise of the powers of arrest, which meet the standards prescribed by the department pursuant to Section 7583.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26035.

Nothing in Section 25850 shall prevent any person engaged in any lawful business, including a nonprofit organization, or any officer, employee, or agent authorized by that person for lawful purposes connected with that business, from having a loaded firearm within the person’s place of business, or any person in lawful possession of private property from having a loaded firearm on that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26040.

Nothing in Section 25850 shall prevent any person from carrying a loaded firearm in an area within an incorporated city while engaged in hunting, provided that the hunting at that place and time is not prohibited by the city council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26045.

(a) Nothing in Section 25850 is intended to preclude the carrying of any loaded firearm, under circumstances where it would otherwise be lawful, by a person who reasonably believes that any person or the property of any person is in immediate, grave danger and that the carrying of the weapon is necessary for the preservation of that person or property.

(b) A violation of Section 25850 is justifiable when a person who possesses a firearm reasonably believes that person is in grave danger because of circumstances forming the basis of a current restraining order issued by a court against another person who has been found to pose a threat to the life or safety of the person who possesses the firearm. This subdivision may not apply when the circumstances involve a mutual
 restraining order issued pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code absent a factual finding of a specific threat to the person’s life or safety. It is not the intent of the Legislature to limit, restrict, or narrow the application of current statutory or judicial authority to apply this or other justifications to a defendant charged with violating Section 25850 or committing another similar offense. Upon trial for violating Section 25850, the trier of fact shall determine whether the defendant was acting out of a reasonable belief that the defendant was in grave danger.

(c) As used in this section, “immediate” means the brief interval before and after the local law enforcement agency, when reasonably possible, has been notified of the danger and before the arrival of its assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 185, Sec. 7.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26050.

Nothing in Section 25850 is intended to preclude the carrying of a loaded firearm by any person while engaged in the act of making or attempting to make a lawful arrest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26055.

Nothing in Section 25850 shall prevent any person from having a loaded weapon, if it is otherwise lawful, at the person’s place of residence, including any temporary residence or campsite.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26060.

Nothing in Section 25850 shall prevent any person from storing aboard any vessel or aircraft any loaded or unloaded rocket, rocket propelled projectile launcher, or similar device designed primarily for emergency or distress signaling purposes, or from possessing that type of a device while in a permitted hunting area or traveling to or from a permitted hunting area and carrying a valid California permit or license to hunt.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Loaded Firearm in a Motor Vehicle [26100. - 26100.]

26100.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for a driver of any motor vehicle or the owner of any motor vehicle, whether or not the owner of the vehicle is occupying the vehicle, knowingly to permit any other person to carry into or bring into the vehicle a firearm in violation of Section 25850 of this code or Section 2006 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) Any driver or owner of any vehicle, whether or not the owner of the vehicle is occupying the vehicle, who knowingly permits any other person to discharge any firearm from the vehicle is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or in state prison for 16 months or two or three years.

(c) Any person who willfully and maliciously discharges a firearm from a motor vehicle at another person other than an occupant of a motor vehicle is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in state prison for three, five, or seven years.

(d) Except as provided in Section 3002 of the Fish and Game Code, any person who willfully and maliciously discharges a firearm from a motor vehicle is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or in the state prison.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Carrying a Loaded Firearm as a Nuisance [26110. - 26110.]

26110.

(a) The unlawful carrying of any firearm in violation of Section 25850 is a nuisance and is subject to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(b) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any firearm that was used in the violation of any provision of the Fish and Game Code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) Any firearm that is forfeited pursuant to Section 5008.6 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 534, Sec. 3.   (AB 2739)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. License to Carry A Pistol, Revolver, or Other Firearm Capable of Being Concealed Upon the Person [26150. - 26235.]

26150.

(a) When a California resident applies for a new license or license renewal to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, the sheriff of a county shall issue or renew a license to that California resident upon proof of all of the following:

(1) The applicant is not a disqualified person to receive such a license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202.

(2) The applicant is at least 21 years of age, and presents clear evidence of the person’s identity and age, as defined in Section 16400.

(3) The applicant is a resident of the county or a city within the county, or the applicant’s principal place of employment or business is in the county or a city within the county and the applicant spends a substantial period of time in that place of employment or business. Prima facie evidence of residency within the county or a city within the county includes, but is not limited to, the address where the applicant is registered to vote, the applicant’s filing of a homeowner’s property tax exemption, and other acts, occurrences, or events that indicate presence in the county or a city within the county is more than temporary or transient. The presumption of residency in the county or city within the county may be rebutted by satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s primary residence is in another county or city within the county.

(4) The applicant has completed a course of training as described in Section 26165.

(5) The applicant is the recorded owner, with the Department of Justice, of the pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the license will be issued.

(b) When a non-California resident applies for a new license or license renewal to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, the sheriff of a county shall issue or renew a license to that non-California resident, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The applicant is not a disqualified person to receive the license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202 and all comparable statutes and
 provisions of law of the nonresident applicant’s state of residence.

(2) The applicant is at least 21 years of age and presents clear evidence of the nonresident’s identity, age, and state of residence. “Clear evidence of the nonresident’s identity, age, and state of residence” means either of the following:

(A) A valid driver’s license from their state of residence.

(B) A valid out-of-state identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(3) The applicant attests, under oath, that the jurisdiction in which they have applied is the primary location in California in which they intend to travel or spend time.

(4) The applicant has completed a course of training that meets the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 26165 and subdivision (d) of Section 26165, as it pertains to the licensing authority to which the application is submitted. If the licensing authority to which the application is submitted has not approved of any online training courses, the applicant may complete an online training course approved by any other licensing authority that issues licenses under this section.

(5) The applicant has completed live-fire shooting exercises, as required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 26165, for each pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the applicant is applying to be licensed to carry in California. The applicant shall inform the licensing authority to which they
 have applied of the live-fire course the applicant intends to complete, and the licensing authority shall either approve the course or suggest an alternative acceptable course within 75 miles of the applicant’s residence.

(6) The applicant has identified on the application the make, model, caliber, and serial number of each pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the applicant is applying to be licensed to carry in California. Identification of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm that cannot lawfully be carried or possessed in California shall be cause for denial of a license as to that pistol, revolver, or other firearm.

(c) The sheriff shall issue or renew a license under subdivision (a) in either of the following formats:

(1) A license to carry concealed a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(2) Where the population of the county is less than 200,000 persons according to the most recent federal decennial census, a license to carry loaded and exposed in only that county a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(d) (1) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the sheriff of the county from entering into an agreement with the chief or other head of a municipal police department of a city to process all applications for licenses, renewals of licenses, or amendments to licenses pursuant to this chapter, in lieu of the sheriff.

(2) This subdivision shall only apply to applicants who reside within the city in which the chief or other head of the municipal police department has agreed to process applications for licenses, renewals of licenses, and amendments to licenses, pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 2.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26155.

(a) When a California resident applies for a new license or license renewal to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, the chief or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county shall issue or renew a license to that California resident upon proof of all of the following:

(1) The applicant is not a disqualified person to receive such a license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202.

(2) The applicant is at least 21 years of age, and presents clear evidence of the person’s identity and age, as defined in Section 16400.

(3) The applicant is a resident of that city or city and county. Prima facie evidence of residency within the county or a city within the county includes, but is not limited to, the address where the applicant is registered to vote, the applicant’s filing of a homeowner’s property tax exemption, and other acts, occurrences, or events that indicate presence in the county or a city within the county is more than temporary or transient. The presumption of residency in the county or city within the county may be rebutted by satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s primary residence is in another county or city within the county.

(4) The applicant has completed a course of training as described in Section 26165.

(5) The applicant is the recorded owner, with the Department of Justice, of the pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the license will be issued.

(b) When a non-California resident applies for a new license or license renewal to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, the chief or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county shall issue or renew a license to that nonresident, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The applicant is not a disqualified person to receive the license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202 and all comparable statutes and provisions of law of the nonresident applicant’s state of residence.

(2) The applicant is at least 21 years of age, and presents clear evidence of the nonresident’s identity, age, and state of residence. “Clear evidence of the nonresident’s identity, age, and state of residence” means either of the following:

(A) A valid driver’s license from their state of residence.

(B) A valid out-of-state identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(3) The applicant attests, under oath, that the jurisdiction in which they have applied is the primary location in California in which they intend to travel or spend time.

(4) The applicant has completed a course of training that meets the criteria set forth in
 paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 26165 and subdivision (d) of Section 26165, as it pertains to the licensing authority to which the application is submitted. If the licensing authority to which the application is submitted has not approved of any online training courses, the applicant may complete an online training course approved by any other licensing authority that issues licenses under this section.

(5) The applicant has completed live-fire shooting exercises, as required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 26165, for each pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the applicant is applying to be licensed to carry in California. The applicant shall inform the licensing authority to which they have applied of the live-fire course the applicant intends to complete, and the licensing authority
 shall either approve the course or suggest an alternative acceptable course within 75 miles of the applicant’s residence.

(6) The applicant has identified on the application the make, model, caliber, and serial number of each pistol, revolver, or other firearm they intend to carry in California. Identification of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm that cannot lawfully be carried in California shall be cause for denial of a license as to that pistol, revolver, or other firearm.

(c) The chief or other head of a municipal police department
 shall issue or renew a license under subdivision (a) in either of the following formats:

(1) A license to carry concealed a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(2) Where the population of the county in which the city is located is less than 200,000 persons according to the most recent federal decennial census, a license to carry loaded and exposed in only that county a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the chief or other head of a municipal police department of any city from entering an agreement with the sheriff of the county in which the city is located for the sheriff to
 process all applications for licenses, renewals of licenses, and amendments to licenses, pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 3.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26160.

Each licensing authority shall publish and make available a written policy summarizing the provisions of Section 26150 and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 26155.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26162.

(a) Prior to the issuance of a license, renewal of a license, or amendment to a license pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 26150 or subdivision (a) of Section 26155, each licensing authority with direct access to the designated Department of Justice system shall determine if the applicant is the recorded owner of the particular pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person reported in the application for a license or the application for the amendment to a license under this chapter.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), an agency with direct access to the designated Department of Justice system shall confirm the applicant’s information with firearm ownership
 maintained in the system. An agency without access to the system shall confirm this information with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 4.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26165.

(a) For new license applicants, the course of training for issuance of a license under Section 26150 or 26155 may be any course acceptable to the licensing authority that meets all of the following minimum criteria:

(1) The course shall be no less than 16 hours in length.

(2) The course shall include instruction on firearm safety, firearm handling, shooting technique, safe storage, legal methods to transport firearms and securing firearms in vehicles, laws governing where permitholders may carry firearms, laws regarding the permissible use of a firearm, and laws regarding the permissible use of lethal force in
 self-defense.

(3) The course shall include a component, no less than one hour in length, on mental health and mental health resources.

(4) Except for the component on mental health and mental health resources, the course shall be taught and supervised by firearms instructors certified by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 31635, or in a manner to be prescribed by regulation.

(5) The course shall require students to pass a written examination to
 demonstrate their understanding of the covered topics.

(6) The course shall include live-fire shooting exercises on a firing range and shall include a demonstration by the applicant of safe handling of, and shooting proficiency with, each firearm that the applicant is applying to be licensed to carry.

(b) A licensing authority shall establish, and make available to the public, the standards it uses when issuing licenses with regards to the required live-fire shooting exercises, including, but not limited to, a minimum number of rounds to be fired and minimum passing scores from specified firing distances.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the licensing authority may require a community college course certified by the
 Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, up to a maximum of 24 hours, but only if required uniformly of all license applicants
 without exception.

(d) For license renewal applicants, the course of training may be any course acceptable to the licensing authority, shall be no less than eight hours, and shall satisfy the requirements of paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a). No course of training shall be required for any person certified by the licensing authority as a trainer for purposes of this section, in order for that person to renew a license issued pursuant to this chapter.

(e) The applicant shall not be required to pay for any training courses prior to the initial determination of whether the applicant is a disqualified person pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 26202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 13.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26170.

(a) Upon proof of all of the following, the sheriff of a county, or the chief or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county, shall issue to an applicant a new license or license renewal to carry concealed a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person:

(1) The applicant is not a disqualified person to receive such a license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202.

(2) The applicant is at least 21 years of age, and presents clear evidence of the person’s identity and age, as defined in Section 16400.

(3) The applicant has been deputized or appointed as a peace officer pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.6 by that sheriff or that chief of police or other head of a municipal police department.

(4) The applicant is the recorded owner, with the Department of Justice, of the pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the license will be issued, or, the applicant is authorized to carry a firearm that is registered to the agency for which the licensee has been deputized or appointed to serve as a peace officer.

(b) Direct or indirect fees for the issuance of a license pursuant to this section may be waived.

(c) The fact that an applicant for a
 license to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person has been deputized or appointed as a peace officer pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.6 shall be considered only for the purpose of issuing a license pursuant to this section, and shall not be considered for the purpose of issuing a license pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 14.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26175.

(a) (1) (A) Applications for licenses and applications for amendments to licenses under this chapter shall be uniform throughout the state, upon forms to be prescribed by the Attorney General.

(B) Upon the effective date of the act that added this subparagraph, the Attorney General may issue forms to be used for applications for licenses and applications for amendments to licenses under this chapter, in conformance with the act that added this subparagraph, to be used until 60 days after the effective date of the act that added this subparagraph.

(2) The Attorney General shall
 convene a committee composed of one representative of the California State Sheriffs’ Association, one representative of the California Police Chiefs Association, and one representative of the Department of Justice to review, and, as deemed appropriate, revise the standard application form for licenses prescribed by the Attorney General pursuant to paragraph (1). If the committee does not release a revised application form by 60 days after the effective date of the act that added subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the Attorney General has the sole authority to revise the standard application form for licenses. After the initial revised application is issued, if one of the committee’s members concludes that further revisions are necessary, that member shall notify the other members of the committee, and the committee shall revise the application within three months of the notification. If the committee
 fails to release a revised application within that time, the Attorney General has the sole authority to revise the standard application form for licenses.

(3) (A) The Attorney General shall develop a uniform license that may be used as indicia of proof of licensure throughout the state.

(B) The Attorney General shall approve the use of licenses issued by local agencies that contain all the information required in subdivision (i), including a recent photograph of the applicant, and are deemed to be in substantial compliance with standards developed by the committee described in subparagraph (C), if developed, as they relate to the physical dimensions and general appearance of the licenses. The Attorney General shall retain exemplars of approved
 licenses and shall maintain a list of agencies issuing local licenses. Approved licenses may be used as indicia of proof of licensure under this chapter in lieu of the uniform license developed by the Attorney General.

(C) A committee composed of two representatives of the California State Sheriffs’ Association, two representatives of the California Police Chiefs Association, and one representative of the Department of Justice shall convene to review and revise, as the committee deems appropriate, the design standard for licenses issued by local agencies that may be used as indicia of proof of licensure throughout the state, provided that the design standard meets the requirements of subparagraph (B). If the committee does not issue a design standard by 60 days after the effective date of the act that added subparagraph (B) of paragraph
 (1), the Attorney General has the sole authority to set the design standard for licenses issued by local agencies that may be used as indicia of proof of licensure throughout the state, provided that the design standard meets the requirements of subparagraph (B). After the initial design standard is issued, if one of the committee’s members concludes that further revisions are necessary, that member shall notify the other members of the committee, and the committee shall revise the design standard within three months of the notification. If the committee fails to release a design standard within that time, the Attorney General has the sole authority to revise the design standard for licenses issued by local agencies that may be used as indicia of proof of licensure throughout the state.

(b) The application shall include a section summarizing the requirements
 of state law that result in the automatic denial of a license.

(c) (1) The standard application form for licenses described in subdivision (a) shall require information from the applicant, including, but not limited to, the name, occupation, residence, and business address of the applicant, the applicant’s age, height, weight, and color of eyes and hair, the applicant’s prior detentions, arrests, and criminal convictions, whether the applicant has been the subject of an order listed in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 26202 or a valid restraining, protective, or stay-away order issued by an out-of-state jurisdiction pursuant to laws concerning domestic violence, family law, protection of children or elderly persons, stalking, harassment, witness intimidation, or firearm possession, whether the applicant has
 previously been taken into custody as a danger to self or others under Section 5150 or Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 5585) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, assessed under Section 5151 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, admitted to a mental health facility under Section 5151 or 5152 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or certified under Section 5250, 5260, or 5270.15 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, whether any licensing authority in this state or elsewhere has previously denied the applicant a license to carry a firearm or revoked such a license for any reason, the names and contact information of three persons willing to serve as references for the applicant, at least one of whom must be a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 273.5, if applicable, and at least one of whom must be the applicant’s cohabitant, if applicable, and other information
 sufficient to make a determination of whether the applicant is a disqualified person pursuant to Section 26202.
